Florida, session 2026, SB328.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 192 193 Section 1.â(1)âThis act may be cited as the âFlorida 194 Economic Prosperity and Immigration Act.â 195 (2)âThe purpose of this act is to show that although the 196 administration of immigration is incredibly complex and 197 immigration regulation is the role of the Federal Government, 198 this state should do its part, when possible, by welcoming, 199 valuing, and upholding the dignity of all immigrants who call 200 the Sunshine State home. 201 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 202 20.60, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 203 20.60âDepartment of Commerce; creation; powers and duties.â 204 (3)(a)âThe following divisions and offices of the 205 Department of Commerce are established: 206 1.âThe Division of Economic Development. 207 2.âThe Division of Community Development. 208 3.âThe Division of Workforce Services. 209 4.âThe Division of Finance and Administration. 210 5.âThe Division of Information Technology. 211 6.âThe Office of the Secretary. 212 7.âThe Office of Economic Accountability and Transparency, 213 which shall: 214 a.âOversee the departmentâs critical objectives as 215 determined by the secretary and make sure that the departmentâs 216 key objectives are clearly communicated to the public. 217 b.âOrganize department resources, expertise, data, and 218 research to focus on and solve the complex economic challenges 219 facing the state. 220 c.âProvide leadership for the departmentâs priority issues 221 that require integration of policy, management, and critical 222 objectives from multiple programs and organizations internal and 223 external to the department; and organize and manage external 224 communication on such priority issues. 225 d.âPromote and facilitate key department initiatives to 226 address priority economic issues and explore data and identify 227 opportunities for innovative approaches to address such economic 228 issues. 229 e.âPromote strategic planning for the department. 230 8.âThe Office for New Americans, which shall: 231 a.âCreate and implement a statewide strategy and program to 232 foster and promote immigrant and refugee inclusion in this state 233 in order to improve economic mobility, enhance civic 234 participation, and improve receiving communitiesâ openness to 235 immigrants and refugees. 236 b.âAddress this stateâs workforce needs by connecting 237 employers and job seekers within the immigrant and refugee 238 communities. 239 c.âServe as an information clearinghouse for state agencies 240 on immigration-related policy issues and coordinate among 241 agencies as appropriate to make policy recommendations. 242 d.âAct as a point of contact for state licensing boards and 243 other agencies dealing with professional regulations. 244 e.âIdentify and support implementation of programs and 245 strategies, including the creation of alternative employment 246 pathways, to reduce employment barriers for immigrants and 247 refugees. 248 f.âWork with state agencies and community and foundation 249 partners to undertake studies and to research and analyze 250 economic and demographic trends to better understand and serve 251 this stateâs immigrant and refugee communities. 252 g.âCoordinate and establish best practices for language 253 access initiatives for all state agencies. 254 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 322.08, Florida 255 Statutes, is amended to read: 256 322.08âApplication for license; requirements for license 257 and identification card forms.â 258 (2)âEach such application shall include the following 259 information regarding the applicant: 260 (a)âFull name (first, middle or maiden, and last), gender, 261 proof of social security card number satisfactory to the 262 department, which may include a military identification card, 263 county of residence, mailing address, proof of residential 264 address satisfactory to the department, country of birth, and a 265 brief description. An applicant who cannot provide a social 266 security card number must provide proof of a number associated 267 with a document establishing identity, as specified in paragraph 268 (c). 269 (b)âProof of birth date satisfactory to the department. 270 (c)âProof of identity satisfactory to the department. Such 271 proof must include one of the following documents issued to the 272 applicant: 273 1.âA driver license record or identification card record 274 from another jurisdiction which complies with the REAL ID Act of 275 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-13, and which required the applicant to 276 submit a document for identification which is substantially 277 similar to a document required under subparagraph 2., 278 subparagraph 3., subparagraph 4., subparagraph 5., subparagraph 279 6., subparagraph 7., or subparagraph 8.; 280 2.âA certified copy of a United States birth certificate.; 281 3.âA valid, unexpired United States passport or passport 282 card.; 283 4.âA naturalization certificate issued by the United States 284 Department of Homeland Security.; 285 5.âA valid, unexpired alien registration receipt card 286 (green card).; 287 6.âA Consular Report of Birth Abroad provided by the United 288 States Department of State.; 289 7.âAn unexpired employment authorization card issued by the 290 United States Department of Homeland Security.; or 291 8.âProof of any of the following documents nonimmigrant 292 classification provided by the United States Department of 293 Homeland Security, for an original driver license. In order to 294 prove nonimmigrant classification, an applicant must provide at 295 least one of the following documents. In addition, the 296 department may require applicants to produce United States 297 Department of Homeland Security documents for the sole purpose 298 of establishing the maintenance of, or efforts to maintain, 299 continuous lawful presence: 300 a.âA notice of hearing from an immigration court scheduling 301 a hearing on any proceeding. 302 b.âA notice from the Board of Immigration Appeals 303 acknowledging pendency of an appeal. 304 c.âA notice of the approval of an application for 305 adjustment of status issued by the United States Citizenship and 306 Immigration Services. 307 d.âAn official documentation confirming the filing of a 308 petition for asylum or refugee status or any other relief issued 309 by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. 310 e.âA notice of action transferring any pending matter from 311 another jurisdiction to this state issued by the United States 312 Citizenship and Immigration Services. 313 f.âAn order of an immigration judge or immigration officer 314 granting relief which that authorizes the alien to live and work 315 in the United States, including, but not limited to, asylum. 316 g.âEvidence that an application is pending for adjustment 317 of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for permanent 318 residence in the United States or conditional permanent resident 319 status in the United States, if a visa number is available 320 having a current priority date for processing by the United 321 States Citizenship and Immigration Services. 322 h.âAn unexpired passport issued by the government of 323 another country with: 324 (I)âA stamp or mark affixed by the Federal Government onto 325 the passport to evidence and authorize lawful presence in the 326 United States; or 327 (II)âAn unexpired I-94, or current permanent resident card, 328 or unexpired immigrant visa, issued by the Federal Government. 329 9.âA passport issued by a foreign government. 330 10.âA birth certificate issued by a foreign government. 331 11.âA consular identification document. 332 12.âA national identification card issued by a foreign 333 government. 334 13.âA driver license issued by a foreign government. If the 335 foreign driver license is in a language other than English, the 336 driver license must be accompanied by a certified translation or 337 an affidavit of translation into English. 338 14.âA school document, including any document issued by a 339 public or private primary or secondary school or a postsecondary 340 institution, college, or university, which either includes the 341 applicantâs date of birth or, if a foreign school document, is 342 sealed by the school and includes a photograph of the applicant 343 at the age the record was issued. 344 15.âA court document issued by or filed with a state 345 government in which the applicant is named as a party to a court 346 proceeding. 347 16.âAn income tax return. 348 17.âA marriage license on which the applicant is named as a 349 party. If the language on the marriage license is a language 350 other than English, the marriage license must be accompanied by 351 a certified translation or an affidavit of translation into 352 English. 353 18.âA judgment for the dissolution of a marriage on which 354 the applicant is named as a party. If the language on the 355 judgment is a language other than English, the judgment must be 356 accompanied by a certified translation or an affidavit of 357 translation into English. 358 359 A driver license or temporary permit issued based on documents 360 required in subparagraph 7., or subparagraph 8., subparagraph 361 9., subparagraph 10., subparagraph 11., subparagraph 12., or 362 subparagraph 13. is valid for a period not to exceed the 363 expiration date of the document presented or 8 years, whichever 364 date first occurs. A driver license or temporary permit issued 365 based on documents required in subparagraph 14., subparagraph 366 15., subparagraph 16., subparagraph 17., or subparagraph 18. is 367 valid for 8 years 1 year. 368 (d)âWhether the applicant has previously been licensed to 369 drive, and, if so, when and by what state, and whether any such 370 license or driving privilege has ever been disqualified, 371 revoked, or suspended, or whether an application has ever been 372 refused, and, if so, the date of and reason for such 373 disqualification, suspension, revocation, or refusal. 374 (e)âEach such application may include fingerprints and 375 other unique biometric means of identity. 376 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 322.12, Florida 377 Statutes, is amended to read: 378 322.12âExamination of applicants.â 379 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that every 380 applicant for an original driver license in this state be 381 required to pass an examination pursuant to this section. 382 However, the department may waive the knowledge, endorsement, 383 and skills tests for an applicant who is otherwise qualified, 384 except for an applicant who provides proof of identity under s. 385 322.08(2)(c)9., 10., 11., 12., 13., 14., 15., 16., 17., or 18., 386 and who surrenders a valid driver license from another state or 387 a province of Canada, or a valid driver license issued by the 388 United States Armed Forces, if the driver applies for a Florida 389 license of an equal or lesser classification. An applicant who 390 fails to pass the initial knowledge test incurs a $10 fee for 391 each subsequent test, to be deposited into the Highway Safety 392 Operating Trust Fund, except that if a subsequent test is 393 administered by the tax collector, the tax collector shall 394 retain such $10 fee, less the general revenue service charge set 395 forth in s. 215.20(1). An applicant who fails to pass the 396 initial skills test incurs a $20 fee for each subsequent test, 397 to be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, 398 except that if a subsequent test is administered by the tax 399 collector, the tax collector shall retain such $20 fee, less the 400 general revenue service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1). A 401 person who seeks to retain a hazardous-materials endorsement, 402 pursuant to s. 322.57(1)(e), must pass the hazardous-materials 403 test, upon surrendering his or her commercial driver license, if 404 the person has not taken and passed the hazardous-materials test 405 within 2 years before applying for a commercial driver license 406 in this state. 407 Section 5.âSubsection (4) of section 322.142, Florida 408 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (5) is added to that 409 section, to read: 410 322.142âColor photographic or digital imaged licenses; 411 protection of personal information.â 412 (4)âThe department may maintain a film negative or print 413 file. The department shall maintain a record of the digital 414 images and signatures image and signature of the licensees, 415 together with other data required by the department for 416 identification and retrieval. Reproductions from the file or 417 digital record are exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1) 418 and may be made and issued only for any of the following 419 purposes: 420 (a)âFor departmental administrative purposes.; 421 (b)âFor the issuance of duplicate licenses.; 422 (c)âIn response to law enforcement agency requests, except 423 as provided in subsection (5).; 424 (d)âTo the Department of Business and Professional 425 Regulation and the Department of Health pursuant to an 426 interagency agreement for the purpose of accessing digital 427 images for reproduction of licenses issued by the Department of 428 Business and Professional Regulation or the Department of 429 Health.; 430 (e)âTo the Department of State or a supervisor of elections 431 pursuant to an interagency agreement to facilitate 432 determinations of eligibility of voter registration applicants 433 and registered voters in accordance with ss. 98.045 and 98.075.; 434 (f)âTo the Department of Revenue pursuant to an interagency 435 agreement for use in establishing paternity and establishing, 436 modifying, or enforcing support obligations in Title IV-D 437 cases.; 438 (g)âTo the Department of Children and Families pursuant to 439 an interagency agreement to conduct protective investigations 440 under part III of chapter 39 and chapter 415.; 441 (h)âTo the Department of Children and Families pursuant to 442 an interagency agreement specifying the number of employees in 443 each of that departmentâs regions to be granted access to the 444 records for use as verification of identity to expedite the 445 determination of eligibility for public assistance and for use 446 in public assistance fraud investigations.; 447 (i)âTo the Agency for Health Care Administration pursuant 448 to an interagency agreement for the purpose of authorized 449 agencies verifying photographs in the Care Provider Background 450 Screening Clearinghouse authorized under s. 435.12.; 451 (j)âTo the Department of Financial Services pursuant to an 452 interagency agreement to facilitate the location of owners of 453 unclaimed property, the validation of unclaimed property claims, 454 the identification of fraudulent or false claims, and the 455 investigation of allegations of violations of the insurance code 456 by licensees and unlicensed persons.; 457 (k)âTo the Department of Commerce pursuant to an 458 interagency agreement to facilitate the validation of 459 reemployment assistance claims and the identification of 460 fraudulent or false reemployment assistance claims.; 461 (l)âTo district medical examiners pursuant to an 462 interagency agreement for the purpose of identifying a deceased 463 individual, determining cause of death, and notifying next of 464 kin of any investigations, including autopsies and other 465 laboratory examinations, authorized in s. 406.11.; 466 (m)âTo the following persons for the purpose of identifying 467 a person as part of the official work of a court: 468 1.âA justice or judge of this state; 469 2.âAn employee of the state courts system who works in a 470 position that is designated in writing for access by the Chief 471 Justice of the Supreme Court or a chief judge of a district or 472 circuit court, or by his or her designee; or 473 3.âA government employee who performs functions on behalf 474 of the state courts system in a position that is designated in 475 writing for access by the Chief Justice or a chief judge, or by 476 his or her designee.; or 477 (n)âTo the Agency for Health Care Administration pursuant 478 to an interagency agreement to prevent health care fraud. If the 479 Agency for Health Care Administration enters into an agreement 480 with a private entity to carry out duties relating to health 481 care fraud prevention, such contracts shall include, but need 482 not be limited to: 483 1.âProvisions requiring internal controls and audit 484 processes to identify access, use, and unauthorized access of 485 information. 486 2.âA requirement to report unauthorized access or use to 487 the Agency for Health Care Administration within 1 business day 488 after the discovery of the unauthorized access or use. 489 3.âProvisions for liquidated damages for unauthorized 490 access or use of no less than $5,000 per occurrence. 491 (5)(a)âThis subsection shall be known and may be cited as 492 the âDriver License Privacy Act.â 493 (b)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âagency that 494 primarily enforces immigration lawâ includes, but is not limited 495 to, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, United 496 States Customs and Border Protection, or any successor agencies 497 that have similar duties. 498 (c)âExcept as required for the department to issue or renew 499 a driver license or learnerâs driver license that meets federal 500 standards for identification, the department may not disclose or 501 make accessible, in any manner, to any agency that primarily 502 enforces immigration law or to any employee or agent of such 503 agency photographs and related information pertaining to persons 504 whose images or personal identifying information are possessed 505 by the department, unless the department is presented with a 506 lawful court order or judicial warrant signed by a judge 507 appointed under Article III of the United States Constitution. 508 Within 3 days after receiving a request for information under 509 this subsection from such an agency, the department must notify 510 the person about whom such information was requested of the 511 request and the identity of the agency that made such request. 512 (d)âBefore any person or entity receives or has access to 513 information from the department under this subsection, the 514 department must require such person or entity to certify to the 515 department that the person or entity will not: 516 1.âUse such information for civil immigration purposes; or 517 2.âDisclose such information to any agency that primarily 518 enforces immigration law or to any employee or agent of any such 519 agency unless such disclosure is pursuant to a cooperative 520 arrangement between municipal, state, and federal agencies, if 521 the arrangement does not enforce immigration law, and if the 522 disclosure is limited to the specific information being sought 523 pursuant to the arrangement. 524 (e)âIn addition to any records required to be kept pursuant 525 to 18 U.S.C. s. 2721(c), any person or entity that receives or 526 has access to information from the department under this 527 subsection must keep both of the following records for a period 528 of 5 years: 529 1.âRecords of all the uses of such department information. 530 2.âRecords that identify each person or entity that 531 primarily enforces immigration law which receives such 532 department information from the person or entity. 533 (f)âThe records identified in paragraph (e) must be 534 maintained in a manner and form prescribed by department rule 535 and must be available for inspection by the department. 536 Section 6.âSubsection (3) of section 322.17, Florida 537 Statutes, is amended to read: 538 322.17âReplacement licenses and permits.â 539 (3)âNotwithstanding any other provision provisions of this 540 chapter, if a licensee establishes his or her identity for a 541 driver license using an identification document authorized under 542 s. 322.08(2)(c)7.-18. s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8., the licensee may 543 not obtain a duplicate or replacement instruction permit or 544 driver license except in person and upon submission of an 545 identification document authorized under s. 322.08(2)(c)7.-18. 546 s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8. 547 Section 7.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) and paragraph 548 (c) of subsection (4) of section 322.18, Florida Statutes, are 549 amended to read: 550 322.18âOriginal applications, licenses, and renewals; 551 expiration of licenses; delinquent licenses.â 552 (2)âEach applicant who is entitled to the issuance of a 553 driver license, as provided in this section, shall be issued a 554 driver license, as follows: 555 (d)1.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, 556 if an applicant establishes his or her identity for a driver 557 license using a document authorized in s. 322.08(2)(c)7.-13. s. 558 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8., the driver license shall expire 8 years 1 559 year after the date of issuance or upon the expiration date 560 cited on the United States Department of Homeland Security 561 documents, whichever date first occurs. 562 2.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if 563 an applicant establishes his or her identity for a driver 564 license using a document authorized in s. 322.08(2)(c)14.-18., 565 the driver license shall expire 8 years after the date of 566 issuance. 567 (4) 568 (c)1.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, 569 if a licensee establishes his or her identity for a driver 570 license using an identification document authorized under s. 571 322.08(2)(c)7.-13. s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8., the licensee may not 572 renew the driver license except in person and upon submission of 573 an identification document authorized under s. 322.08(2)(c)7. 574 13. s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8. A driver license renewed under this 575 subparagraph paragraph expires 8 years 1 year after the date of 576 issuance or upon the expiration date cited on the United States 577 Department of Homeland Security documents, whichever date first 578 occurs. 579 2.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if 580 a licensee establishes his or her identity for a driver license 581 using an identification document authorized under s. 582 322.08(2)(c)14.-18., the licensee may only renew the driver 583 license in person and upon submission of an identification 584 document authorized under s. 322.08(2)(c)14.-18. A driver 585 license renewed under this subparagraph expires 8 years after 586 the date of issuance. 587 Section 8.âSubsection (5) of section 322.19, Florida 588 Statutes, is amended to read: 589 322.19âChange of address, name, or citizenship status.â 590 (5)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if 591 a licensee established his or her identity for a driver license 592 using an identification document authorized under s. 593 322.08(2)(c)7.-18. s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8., the licensee may not 594 change his or her name or address except in person and upon 595 submission of an identification document authorized under s. 596 322.08(2)(c)7.-18. s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8. 597 Section 9.âSection 395.3027, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 598 Section 10.âSubsection (6) is added to section 402.308, 599 Florida Statutes, to read: 600 402.308âIssuance of license.â 601 (6)âIMMIGRATION STATUS.âThe department or a local licensing 602 agency may not deny a child care facility a license or a license 603 renewal based solely on the immigration status of a child under 604 the care of the child care facility. 605 Section 11.âParagraph (f) of subsection (2) of section 606 448.095, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (e), and 607 paragraphs (b) and (e) of subsection (2), paragraph (a) of 608 subsection (4), subsection (5), and paragraphs (a) and (b) of 609 subsection (6) of that section are amended, to read: 610 448.095âEmployment eligibility.â 611 (2)âEMPLOYMENT VERIFICATION.â 612 (b)1.âA public agency shall use the E-Verify system to 613 verify a new employeeâs employment eligibility as required under 614 paragraph (a). 615 2.âBeginning on July 1, 2023, a private employer with 25 or 616 more employees shall use the E-Verify system to verify a new 617 employeeâs employment eligibility as required under paragraph 618 (a). 619 2.3.âEach employer required to use the E-Verify system 620 under this paragraph must certify on its first return each 621 calendar year to the tax service provider that it is in 622 compliance with this section when making contributions to or 623 reimbursing the stateâs unemployment compensation or 624 reemployment assistance system. An employer that voluntarily 625 uses the E-Verify system may also make such a certification on 626 its first return each calendar year in order to document such 627 use. 628 (e)âAn employer may not continue to employ an unauthorized 629 alien after obtaining knowledge that a person is or has become 630 an unauthorized alien. 631 (4)âDEFENSES.â 632 (a)âAn employer that uses the E-Verify system or, if that 633 system is unavailable, the Employment Eligibility Verification 634 form (Form I-9) as provided in paragraph (2)(c), with respect to 635 the employment of an unauthorized alien has established a 636 rebuttable presumption that the employer has not violated s. 637 448.09 with respect to such employment. 638 (5)âPUBLIC AGENCY CONTRACTING.â 639 (a)âA public agency must require in any contract that the 640 contractor, and any subcontractor thereof, register with and use 641 the E-Verify system or the Employment Eligibility Verification 642 form (Form I-9) to verify the work authorization status of all 643 new employees of the contractor or subcontractor. A public 644 agency or a contractor or subcontractor thereof may not enter 645 into a contract unless each party to the contract registers with 646 and uses the E-Verify system or the Employment Eligibility 647 Verification form (Form I-9). 648 (b)âIf a contractor enters into a contract with a 649 subcontractor, the subcontractor must provide the contractor 650 with an affidavit stating that the subcontractor does not 651 employ, contract with, or subcontract with an unauthorized 652 alien. The contractor shall maintain a copy of such affidavit 653 for the duration of the contract. 654 (c)1.âA public agency, contractor, or subcontractor who has 655 a good faith belief that a person or an entity with which it is 656 contracting has knowingly violated s. 448.09(1) shall terminate 657 the contract with the person or entity. 658 2.âA public agency that has a good faith belief that a 659 subcontractor knowingly violated this subsection, but the 660 contractor otherwise complied with this subsection, shall 661 promptly notify the contractor and order the contractor to 662 immediately terminate the contract with the subcontractor. 663 3.âA contract terminated under this paragraph is not a 664 breach of contract and may not be considered as such. If a 665 public agency terminates a contract with a contractor under this 666 paragraph, the contractor may not be awarded a public contract 667 for at least 1 year after the date on which the contract was 668 terminated. A contractor is liable for any additional costs 669 incurred by a public agency as a result of the termination of a 670 contract. 671 (d)âA public agency, contractor, or subcontractor may file 672 a cause of action with a circuit or county court to challenge a 673 termination under paragraph (c) no later than 20 calendar days 674 after the date on which the contract was terminated. 675 (6)âCOMPLIANCE.â 676 (a)âIn addition to the requirements under s. 288.061(6), 677 beginning on July 1, 2024, if the Department of Commerce 678 determines that an employer failed to use the E-Verify system or 679 the Employment Eligibility Verification form (Form I-9) to 680 verify the employment eligibility of employees as required under 681 this section, the department must notify the employer of the 682 departmentâs determination of noncompliance and provide the 683 employer with 30 days to cure the noncompliance. 684 (b)âIf the Department of Commerce determines that an 685 employer failed to use the E-Verify system or the Employment 686 Eligibility Verification form (Form I-9) as required under this 687 section three times in any 24-month period, the department must 688 impose a fine of $1,000 per day until the employer provides 689 sufficient proof to the department that the noncompliance is 690 cured. Noncompliance constitutes grounds for the suspension of 691 all licenses issued by a licensing agency subject to chapter 120 692 until the noncompliance is cured. 693 Section 12.âSubsection (3) of section 454.021, Florida 694 Statutes, is amended to read: 695 454.021âAttorneys; admission to practice law; Supreme Court 696 to govern and regulate.â 697 (3)âUpon certification by the Florida Board of Bar 698 Examiners that an applicant who is an unauthorized immigrant who 699 was brought to the United States as a minor; has been present in 700 the United States for more than 10 years; has received 701 documented employment authorization from the United States 702 Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS); has been issued a 703 social security number; if a male, has registered with the 704 Selective Service System if required to do so under the Military 705 Selective Service Act, 50 U.S.C. App. 453; and has fulfilled all 706 requirements for admission to practice law in this state, the 707 Supreme Court of Florida may admit that applicant as an attorney 708 at law authorized to practice in this state and may direct an 709 order be entered upon the courtâs records to that effect. 710 Section 13.âSubsection (2) of section 760.01, Florida 711 Statutes, is amended to read: 712 760.01âPurposes; construction; title.â 713 (2)âThe general purposes of the Florida Civil Rights Act of 714 1992 are to secure for all individuals within the state freedom 715 from discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, 716 pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap, immigration status, 717 or marital status and thereby to protect their interest in 718 personal dignity, to make available to the state their full 719 productive capacities, to secure the state against domestic 720 strife and unrest, to preserve the public safety, health, and 721 general welfare, and to promote the interests, rights, and 722 privileges of individuals within the state. 723 Section 14.âSection 760.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to 724 read: 725 760.05âFunctions of the commission.âThe commission shall 726 promote and encourage fair treatment and equal opportunity for 727 all persons regardless of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, 728 national origin, age, handicap, immigration status, or marital 729 status and mutual understanding and respect among all members of 730 all economic, social, racial, religious, and ethnic groups; and 731 shall endeavor to eliminate discrimination against, and 732 antagonism between, religious, racial, and ethnic groups and 733 their members. 734 Section 15.âSection 760.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to 735 read: 736 760.07âRemedies for unlawful discrimination.âAny violation 737 of any Florida statute that makes unlawful discrimination 738 because of race, color, religion, gender, pregnancy, national 739 origin, age, handicap, immigration status, or marital status in 740 the areas of education, employment, or public accommodations 741 gives rise to a cause of action for all relief and damages 742 described in s. 760.11(5), unless greater damages are expressly 743 provided for. If the statute prohibiting unlawful discrimination 744 provides an administrative remedy, the action for equitable 745 relief and damages provided for in this section may be initiated 746 only after the plaintiff has exhausted his or her administrative 747 remedy. The term âpublic accommodationsâ does not include lodge 748 halls or other similar facilities of private organizations which 749 are made available for public use occasionally or periodically. 750 The right to trial by jury is preserved in any case in which the 751 plaintiff is seeking actual or punitive damages. 752 Section 16.âSection 760.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to 753 read: 754 760.08âDiscrimination in places of public accommodation. 755 All persons are entitled to the full and equal enjoyment of the 756 goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, and 757 accommodations of any place of public accommodation without 758 discrimination or segregation on the ground of race, color, 759 national origin, sex, pregnancy, handicap, familial status, 760 immigration status, or religion. 761 Section 17.âSubsections (1) and (2), paragraphs (a) and (b) 762 of subsection (3), subsections (4), (5), and (6), and paragraph 763 (a) of subsection (9) of section 760.10, Florida Statutes, are 764 amended to read: 765 760.10âUnlawful employment practices.â 766 (1)âIt is an unlawful employment practice for an employer: 767 (a)âTo discharge or to fail or refuse to hire any 768 individual, or otherwise to discriminate against any individual 769 with respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges 770 of employment, because of such individualâs race, color, 771 religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap, 772 immigration status, or marital status. 773 (b)âTo limit, segregate, or classify employees or 774 applicants for employment in any way which would deprive or tend 775 to deprive any individual of employment opportunities, or 776 adversely affect any individualâs status as an employee, because 777 of such individualâs race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, 778 national origin, age, handicap, immigration status, or marital 779 status. 780 (2)âIt is an unlawful employment practice for an employment 781 agency to fail or refuse to refer for employment, or otherwise 782 to discriminate against, any individual because of race, color, 783 religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap, 784 immigration status, or marital status or to classify or refer 785 for employment any individual on the basis of race, color, 786 religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap, 787 immigration status, or marital status. 788 (3)âIt is an unlawful employment practice for a labor 789 organization: 790 (a)âTo exclude or to expel from its membership, or 791 otherwise to discriminate against, any individual because of 792 race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, 793 handicap, immigration status, or marital status. 794 (b)âTo limit, segregate, or classify its membership or 795 applicants for membership, or to classify or fail or refuse to 796 refer for employment any individual, in any way that would 797 deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment 798 opportunities, or adversely affect any individualâs status as an 799 employee or as an applicant for employment, because of such 800 individualâs race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, national 801 origin, age, handicap, immigration status, or marital status. 802 (4)âIt is an unlawful employment practice for any employer, 803 labor organization, or joint labor-management committee 804 controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining, 805 including on-the-job training programs, to discriminate against 806 any individual because of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, 807 national origin, age, handicap, immigration status, or marital 808 status in admission to, or employment in, any program 809 established to provide apprenticeship or other training. 810 (5)âWhenever, in order to engage in a profession, 811 occupation, or trade, it is required that a person receive a 812 license, certification, or other credential, become a member or 813 an associate of any club, association, or other organization, or 814 pass any examination, it is an unlawful employment practice for 815 any person to discriminate against any other person seeking such 816 license, certification, or other credential, seeking to become a 817 member or associate of such club, association, or other 818 organization, or seeking to take or pass such examination, 819 because of such other personâs race, color, religion, sex, 820 pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap, immigration status, 821 or marital status. 822 (6)âIt is an unlawful employment practice for an employer, 823 labor organization, employment agency, or joint labor-management 824 committee to print, or cause to be printed or published, any 825 notice or advertisement relating to employment, membership, 826 classification, referral for employment, or apprenticeship or 827 other training, indicating any preference, limitation, 828 specification, or discrimination, based on race, color, 829 religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, absence of 830 handicap, immigration status, or marital status. 831 (9)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section, it 832 is not an unlawful employment practice under ss. 760.01-760.10 833 for an employer, employment agency, labor organization, or joint 834 labor-management committee to: 835 (a)âTake or fail to take any action on the basis of 836 religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap, 837 immigration status, or marital status in those certain instances 838 in which religion, sex, condition of pregnancy, national origin, 839 age, absence of a particular handicap, immigration status, or 840 marital status is a bona fide occupational qualification 841 reasonably necessary for the performance of the particular 842 employment to which such action or inaction is related. 843 Section 18.âSubsections (1) through (5) of section 760.23, 844 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 845 760.23âDiscrimination in the sale or rental of housing and 846 other prohibited practices.â 847 (1)âIt is unlawful to refuse to sell or rent after the 848 making of a bona fide offer, to refuse to negotiate for the sale 849 or rental of, or otherwise to make unavailable or deny a 850 dwelling to any person because of race, color, national origin, 851 sex, disability, familial status, immigration status, or 852 religion. 853 (2)âIt is unlawful to discriminate against any person in 854 the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a 855 dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in 856 connection therewith, because of race, color, national origin, 857 sex, disability, familial status, immigration status, or 858 religion. 859 (3)âIt is unlawful to make, print, or publish, or cause to 860 be made, printed, or published, any notice, statement, or 861 advertisement with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling 862 that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination 863 based on race, color, national origin, sex, disability, familial 864 status, immigration status, or religion or an intention to make 865 any such preference, limitation, or discrimination. 866 (4)âIt is unlawful to represent to any person because of 867 race, color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status, 868 immigration status, or religion that any dwelling is not 869 available for inspection, sale, or rental when such dwelling is 870 in fact so available. 871 (5)âIt is unlawful, for profit, to induce or attempt to 872 induce any person to sell or rent any dwelling by a 873 representation regarding the entry or prospective entry into the 874 neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race, color, 875 national origin, sex, disability, familial status, immigration 876 status, or religion. 877 Section 19.âSection 760.24, Florida Statutes, is amended to 878 read: 879 760.24âDiscrimination in the provision of brokerage 880 services.âIt is unlawful to deny any person access to, or 881 membership or participation in, any multiple-listing service, 882 real estate brokersâ organization, or other service, 883 organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or 884 renting dwellings, or to discriminate against him or her in the 885 terms or conditions of such access, membership, or 886 participation, on account of race, color, national origin, sex, 887 disability, familial status, immigration status, or religion. 888 Section 20.âSubsection (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection 889 (2) of section 760.25, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 890 760.25âDiscrimination in the financing of housing or in 891 residential real estate transactions.â 892 (1)âIt is unlawful for any bank, building and loan 893 association, insurance company, or other corporation, 894 association, firm, or enterprise the business of which consists 895 in whole or in part of the making of commercial real estate 896 loans to deny a loan or other financial assistance to a person 897 applying for the loan for the purpose of purchasing, 898 constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a dwelling, 899 or to discriminate against him or her in the fixing of the 900 amount, interest rate, duration, or other term or condition of 901 such loan or other financial assistance, because of the race, 902 color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status, 903 immigration status, or religion of such person or of any person 904 associated with him or her in connection with such loan or other 905 financial assistance or the purposes of such loan or other 906 financial assistance, or because of the race, color, national 907 origin, sex, disability, familial status, immigration status, or 908 religion of the present or prospective owners, lessees, tenants, 909 or occupants of the dwelling or dwellings in relation to which 910 such loan or other financial assistance is to be made or given. 911 (2)(a)âIt is unlawful for any person or entity whose 912 business includes engaging in residential real estate 913 transactions to discriminate against any person in making 914 available such a transaction, or in the terms or conditions of 915 such a transaction, because of race, color, national origin, 916 sex, disability, familial status, immigration status, or 917 religion. 918 Section 21.âSection 760.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to 919 read: 920 760.26âProhibited discrimination in land use decisions and 921 in permitting of development.âIt is unlawful to discriminate in 922 land use decisions or in the permitting of development based on 923 race, color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status, 924 immigration status, religion, or, except as otherwise provided 925 by law, the source of financing of a development or proposed 926 development. 927 Section 22.âSubsection (2) and paragraph (a) of subsection 928 (5) of section 760.29, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 929 760.29âExemptions.â 930 (2)âNothing in ss. 760.20-760.37 prohibits a religious 931 organization, association, or society, or any nonprofit 932 institution or organization operated, supervised, or controlled 933 by or in conjunction with a religious organization, association, 934 or society, from limiting the sale, rental, or occupancy of any 935 dwelling which it owns or operates for other than a commercial 936 purpose to persons of the same religion or from giving 937 preference to such persons, unless membership in such religion 938 is restricted on account of race, color, or national origin, or 939 immigration status. Nothing in ss. 760.20-760.37 prohibits a 940 private club not in fact open to the public, which as an 941 incident to its primary purpose or purposes provides lodgings 942 which it owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose, 943 from limiting the rental or occupancy of such lodgings to its 944 members or from giving preference to its members. 945 (5)âNothing in ss. 760.20-760.37: 946 (a)âProhibits a person engaged in the business of 947 furnishing appraisals of real property from taking into 948 consideration factors other than race, color, national origin, 949 sex, disability, familial status, immigration status, or 950 religion. 951 Section 23.âSection 760.45, Florida Statutes, is created to 952 read: 953 760.45âDiscrimination on the basis of certain driver 954 licenses prohibited.â 955 (1)âA person or an entity, including a business 956 establishment or an employer, may not discriminate against an 957 individual because the individual holds or presents a driver 958 license that does not comply with the REAL ID Act of 2005, Pub. 959 L. No. 109-13. 960 (2)âAn employer may not require an employee to present a 961 driver license unless possessing a driver license is required by 962 law or is lawfully required by the employer. This subsection may 963 not be construed to limit or expand an employerâs authority to 964 require an employee to possess a driver license. 965 (3)âThis section may not be construed to do either of the 966 following: 967 (a)âAlter an employerâs rights or obligations under the 968 Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1324(a), regarding 969 obtaining documentation that evidences identity and 970 authorization for employment. 971 (b)âProhibit any other action taken by an employer which is 972 required under 8 U.S.C. s. 1324a(a). 973 (4)âThe state or a local government; an agent or a person 974 acting on behalf of the state or a local government; or a 975 program or activity that is funded directly by, or receives 976 financial assistance from, the state may not discriminate 977 against an individual because the individual holds or presents a 978 driver license that does not comply with the REAL ID Act of 979 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-13. This prohibition includes, but is not 980 limited to, notifying a law enforcement agency of the 981 individualâs identity or that the individual holds a driver 982 license that does not comply with the REAL ID Act of 2005, Pub. 983 L. No. 109-13, if notification is not required by law or would 984 not have been provided if the individualâs driver license had 985 been compliant with such act. 986 Section 24.âSubsection (1) of section 760.60, Florida 987 Statutes, is amended to read: 988 760.60âDiscriminatory practices of certain clubs 989 prohibited; remedies.â 990 (1)âIt is unlawful for a person to discriminate against any 991 individual because of race, color, religion, gender, national 992 origin, handicap, age above the age of 21, immigration status, 993 or marital status in evaluating an application for membership in 994 a club that has more than 400 members, that provides regular 995 meal service, and that regularly receives payment for dues, 996 fees, use of space, facilities, services, meals, or beverages 997 directly or indirectly from nonmembers for business purposes. It 998 is unlawful for a person, on behalf of such a club, to publish, 999 circulate, issue, display, post, or mail any advertisement, 1000 notice, or solicitation that contains a statement to the effect 1001 that the accommodations, advantages, facilities, membership, or 1002 privileges of the club are denied to any individual because of 1003 race, color, religion, gender, national origin, handicap, age 1004 above the age of 21, immigration status, or marital status. This 1005 subsection does not apply to fraternal or benevolent 1006 organizations, ethnic clubs, or religious organizations where 1007 business activity is not prevalent. 1008 Section 25.âSection 775.0848, Florida Statutes, is amended 1009 to read: 1010 775.0848âCommission of a felony after unlawful reentry into 1011 the United States Offenses committed by an unauthorized alien; 1012 reclassification.âA person who has been previously convicted of 1013 a crime relating to the reentry of removed aliens under 8 U.S.C. 1014 s. 1326 shall have the penalty for committing a any misdemeanor 1015 or felony after such conviction committed by an unauthorized 1016 alien as defined in s. 908.111 shall be reclassified in the 1017 following manner: 1018 (1)âA misdemeanor of the second degree is reclassified to a 1019 misdemeanor of the first degree. 1020 (2)âA misdemeanor of the first degree is reclassified to a 1021 felony of the third degree. 1022 (1)(3)âA felony of the third degree is reclassified to a 1023 felony of the second degree. 1024 (2)(4)âA felony of the second degree is reclassified to a 1025 felony of the first degree. 1026 (3)(5)âA felony of the first degree is reclassified to a 1027 life felony. 1028 Section 26.âSection 787.07, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 1029 Section 27.âSubsection (6) of section 908.102, Florida 1030 Statutes, is amended to read: 1031 908.102âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 1032 (6)ââSanctuary policyâ means a law, policy, practice, 1033 procedure, or custom adopted or allowed by a state entity or 1034 local governmental entity which prohibits or impedes a law 1035 enforcement agency from complying with 8 U.S.C. s. 1373 or which 1036 prohibits or impedes a law enforcement agency from communicating 1037 or cooperating with a federal immigration agency so as to limit 1038 such law enforcement agency in, or prohibit the agency from: 1039 (a)âComplying with an immigration detainer; 1040 (b)âComplying with a request from a federal immigration 1041 agency to notify the agency before the release of an inmate or 1042 detainee in the custody of the law enforcement agency; 1043 (c)âProviding a federal immigration agency access to an 1044 inmate for interview; 1045 (d)âParticipating in any program or agreement authorized 1046 under s. 287 of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1047 1357 as required by s. 908.11; 1048 (e)âProviding a federal immigration agency with an inmateâs 1049 incarceration status or release date; 1050 (f)âProviding information to a state entity on the 1051 immigration status of an inmate or detainee in the custody of 1052 the law enforcement agency; 1053 (g)âExecuting a lawful judicial warrant; or 1054 (h)âParticipating in a federal immigration operation with a 1055 federal immigration agency as permitted by federal and state 1056 law. 1057 Section 28.âSections 908.103, 908.105, and 908.106, Florida 1058 Statutes, are repealed. 1059 Section 29.âParagraph (h) is added to subsection (3) of 1060 section 908.1031, Florida Statutes, to read: 1061 908.1031âState Board of Immigration Enforcement; creation; 1062 purpose and duties.â 1063 (3)âThe board is the chief immigration enforcement officer 1064 of the state and shall: 1065 (h)âInvestigate any complaints received for violations of 1066 and otherwise enforce the Visible Identification Standards for 1067 Immigration-Based Law Enforcement Act pursuant to s. 908.14. 1068 Section 30.âParagraph (i) is added to subsection (4) of 1069 section 908.1032, Florida Statutes, to read: 1070 908.1032âState Immigration Enforcement Council.âThe State 1071 Immigration Enforcement Council, an advisory council as defined 1072 in s. 20.03, is created within the State Board of Immigration 1073 Enforcement for the purpose of advising the board. 1074 (4)âThe council shall: 1075 (i)âCollect data relating to the Visible Identification 1076 Standards for Immigration-Based Law Enforcement Act and, by June 1077 30 of each year, submit to the President of the Senate and the 1078 Speaker of the House of Representatives a report in accordance 1079 with s. 908.14. 1080 Section 31.âSection 908.104, Florida Statutes, is amended 1081 to read: 1082 908.104âCooperation with federal immigration authorities. 1083 To ensure compliance with Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1084 1964, 1085 (1)âConsistent with all duties created in state and federal 1086 law, state and local law enforcement agencies and any official 1087 responsible for directing or supervising such agency shall use 1088 best efforts to support the enforcement of federal immigration 1089 law. This subsection applies to an official, representative, 1090 agent, or employee of the entity or agency only when he or she 1091 is acting within the scope of his or her official duties or 1092 within the scope of his or her employment. 1093 (2)âExcept as otherwise expressly prohibited by federal 1094 law, a state entity, local governmental entity, or law 1095 enforcement agency, or an employee, an agent, or a 1096 representative of the entity or agency, may not prohibit or in 1097 any way restrict a law enforcement agency from taking any of the 1098 following actions with respect to information regarding a 1099 personâs immigration status: 1100 (a)âSending the information to or requesting, receiving, or 1101 reviewing the information from a federal immigration agency for 1102 purposes of this chapter. 1103 (b)âRecording and maintaining the information for purposes 1104 of this chapter. 1105 (c)âExchanging the information with a federal immigration 1106 agency or another state entity, local governmental entity, or 1107 law enforcement agency for purposes of this chapter. 1108 (d)âUsing the information to comply with an immigration 1109 detainer. 1110 (e)âUsing the information to confirm the identity of a 1111 person who is detained by a law enforcement agency. 1112 (f)âSending the applicable information obtained pursuant to 1113 enforcement of s. 448.095 to a federal immigration agency. 1114 (3)âA state entity, local governmental entity, or law 1115 enforcement agency may not prohibit or in any way restrict a law 1116 enforcement officer from executing or assisting in the execution 1117 of a lawful judicial warrant. 1118 (4)(a)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term 1119 âapplicable criminal caseâ means a criminal case in which: 1120 1.âThe judgment requires the defendant to be confined in a 1121 secure correctional facility; and 1122 2.âThe judge: 1123 a.âIndicates in the record under s. 908.105 that the 1124 defendant is subject to an immigration detainer; or 1125 b.âOtherwise indicates in the record that the defendant is 1126 subject to a transfer into federal custody. 1127 (b)âIn an applicable criminal case, when the judge 1128 sentences a defendant who is the subject of an immigration 1129 detainer to confinement, the judge shall issue an order 1130 requiring the secure correctional facility in which the 1131 defendant is to be confined to reduce the defendantâs sentence 1132 by a period of not more than 12 days on the facilityâs 1133 determination that the reduction in sentence will facilitate the 1134 seamless transfer of the defendant into federal custody. For 1135 purposes of this paragraph, the term âsecure correctional 1136 facilityâ means a state correctional institution as defined in 1137 s. 944.02 or a county detention facility or a municipal 1138 detention facility as defined in s. 951.23. 1139 (c)âIf the information specified in sub-subparagraph 1140 (a)2.a. or sub-subparagraph (a)2.b. is not available at the time 1141 the sentence is pronounced in the case, but is received by a law 1142 enforcement agency afterwards, the law enforcement agency shall 1143 notify the judge who shall issue the order described by 1144 paragraph (b) as soon as the information becomes available. 1145 (5)âwhen a county correctional facility or the Department 1146 of Corrections receives verification from a federal immigration 1147 agency that a person subject to an immigration detainer is in 1148 the law enforcement agencyâs custody, the agency must facilitate 1149 a screening of the person by a public defender to determine if 1150 the person is or has been a necessary witness or victim of a 1151 crime of domestic violence, rape, sexual exploitation, sexual 1152 assault, murder, manslaughter, assault, battery, human 1153 trafficking, kidnapping, false imprisonment, involuntary 1154 servitude, fraud in foreign labor contracting, blackmail, 1155 extortion, or witness tampering. The screening must be in the 1156 preferred language of the person being detained. If the public 1157 defender determines that the person is a necessary witness or 1158 victim of the aforementioned acts, the county correctional 1159 facility or the Department of Corrections may decline to comply 1160 with the federal immigration detainer. Otherwise, the county 1161 correctional facility or the Department of Corrections may 1162 securely transport the person to a federal facility in this 1163 state or to another point of transfer to federal custody outside 1164 the jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency. The law 1165 enforcement agency may transfer a person who is subject to an 1166 immigration detainer and is confined in a secure correctional 1167 facility to the custody of a federal immigration agency not 1168 earlier than 12 days before his or her release date. A law 1169 enforcement agency shall obtain judicial authorization before 1170 securely transporting an alien to a point of transfer outside of 1171 this state. 1172 (6)âUpon request from a federal immigration agency, a 1173 sheriff or chief correctional officer operating a county 1174 detention facility must provide the requesting federal 1175 immigration agency a list of all inmates booked into a county 1176 detention facility and any information regarding each inmateâs 1177 immigration status. 1178 (7)âThis section does not require a state entity, local 1179 governmental entity, or law enforcement agency to provide a 1180 federal immigration agency with information related to a victim 1181 of or a witness to a criminal offense if: 1182 (a)âThe victim or witness is necessary to the investigation 1183 or prosecution of a crime, and such crime occurred in the United 1184 States; and 1185 (b)âThe victim or witness timely and in good faith responds 1186 to the entityâs or agencyâs request for information and 1187 cooperates in the investigation or prosecution of such offense. 1188 (8)âA state entity, local governmental entity, or law 1189 enforcement agency that, pursuant to subsection (7), withholds 1190 information regarding the immigration information of a victim of 1191 or witness to a criminal offense shall document the victimâs or 1192 witnessâs cooperation in the entityâs or agencyâs investigative 1193 records related to the offense and shall retain the records for 1194 at least 10 years for the purpose of audit, verification, or 1195 inspection by the Auditor General. 1196 (9)âThis section does not authorize a law enforcement 1197 agency to detain an alien unlawfully present in the United 1198 States pursuant to an immigration detainer solely because the 1199 alien witnessed or reported a crime or was a victim of a 1200 criminal offense. 1201 (10)âThis section does not apply to any alien unlawfully 1202 present in the United States if he or she is or has been a 1203 necessary witness or victim of a crime of domestic violence, 1204 rape, sexual exploitation, sexual assault, murder, manslaughter, 1205 assault, battery, human trafficking, kidnapping, false 1206 imprisonment, involuntary servitude, fraud in foreign labor 1207 contracting, blackmail, extortion, or witness tampering, 1208 provided that such crime was committed in the United States. 1209 Documentation, including, but not limited to, police reports, 1210 testimony, sworn statements, or a victim impact statement, must 1211 be relied upon to verify that the person was a necessary witness 1212 or victim to the crime. 1213 Section 32.âSection 908.1041, Florida Statutes, is created 1214 to read: 1215 908.1041âProhibition against engaging in immigration 1216 enforcement activities near public and private schools, child 1217 care facilities, or religious institutions.â 1218 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 1219 (a)ââChild care facilityâ has the same meaning as in s. 1220 402.302. 1221 (b)ââImmigration enforcement activitiesâ means any action 1222 by a law enforcement officer or agency, including, but not 1223 limited to, the identification, detention, questioning, 1224 investigation, or arrest of individuals based on their 1225 immigration status. 1226 (c)ââPrivate schoolâ has the same meaning as in s. 1002.01. 1227 (d)ââPublic schoolâ means any facility or location 1228 providing primary or secondary education, including, but not 1229 limited to, public K-12 schools, charter schools, and school 1230 grounds. 1231 (e)ââReligious institutionâ means any building or space 1232 primarily used for religious worship or practices, including, 1233 but not limited to, a church, synagogue, mosque, temple, and 1234 other place of religious gathering. 1235 (2)âA law enforcement agency, law enforcement officer, 1236 sheriffâs deputy, or federal immigration agency may not engage 1237 in or cooperate with immigration enforcement activities or 1238 engage in or cooperate with immigration enforcement activities 1239 pursuant to the Unauthorized Alien Transport Program under s. 1240 908.13 within 500 feet of any public or private school, child 1241 care facility, or religious institution, except in cases of 1242 exigent circumstances when immediate action is necessary to 1243 prevent harm or death. A local law enforcement agency, law 1244 enforcement officer, sheriffâs deputy, or federal immigration 1245 agency may not: 1246 (a)âUse agency resources, personnel, or authority to 1247 question, detain, or arrest individuals solely based on their 1248 immigration status on the grounds of, or within 500 feet of, a 1249 public or private school, child care facility, or religious 1250 institution. 1251 (b)âCollaborate with federal immigration agency authorities 1252 for immigration enforcement purposes within or around the areas 1253 described in this subsection unless authorized to do so by a 1254 court with jurisdiction over the matter. 1255 (3)âThis section does not prohibit a local law enforcement 1256 agency, law enforcement officer, sheriffâs deputy, or federal 1257 immigration agency from engaging in activities related to 1258 criminal investigations, emergency responses, or school safety 1259 as authorized by law, provided such activities do not involve 1260 immigration enforcement activities. 1261 (4)âBy August 1, 2026, each local law enforcement agency 1262 shall submit to the Department of Law Enforcement a report 1263 detailing policies and protocols for compliance with this 1264 section, including training protocols for officers. 1265 (5)âA local law enforcement agency, law enforcement 1266 officer, or sheriffâs deputy who violates this section may be 1267 subject to disciplinary action by the local governmental entity, 1268 including suspension, dismissal, or loss of funding for local 1269 enforcement efforts. 1270 Section 33.âSubsections (3) and (4) of section 908.107, 1271 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1272 908.107âEnforcement.â 1273 (3)âIf a local governmental entity or local law enforcement 1274 agency violates this chapter, the court must enjoin the unlawful 1275 sanctuary policy. The court has continuing jurisdiction over the 1276 parties and subject matter and may enforce its orders with the 1277 initiation of contempt proceedings as provided by law. 1278 (4)âAn order approving a consent decree or granting an 1279 injunction must include written findings of fact that describe 1280 with specificity the existence and nature of the sanctuary 1281 policy that violates this chapter. 1282 Section 34.âSection 908.11, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1283 read: 1284 908.11âImmigration enforcement assistance agreements; 1285 reporting requirement.â 1286 (1)âBeginning January 1, 2027, the sheriff or the chief 1287 correctional officer operating a county detention facility may 1288 not must enter into or renew a written agreement with the United 1289 States Immigration and Customs Enforcement to participate in the 1290 immigration program established under s. 287(g) of the 1291 Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1357. The State 1292 Board of Immigration Enforcement must approve the termination of 1293 any such agreement. This subsection does not require a sheriff 1294 or chief correctional officer operating a county detention 1295 facility to participate in a particular program model. 1296 (2)âBeginning no later than April 1, 2025, and until the 1297 sheriff or chief correctional officer operating a county 1298 detention facility that has such a enters into the written 1299 agreement required under subsection (1), each sheriff or chief 1300 correctional officer operating a county detention facility must 1301 notify the State Board of Immigration Enforcement quarterly of 1302 the status of any active or pending agreement. 1303 (3)âThe Department of Law Enforcement must establish a 1304 regular training schedule to educate relevant employees and 1305 other state entities that collaborate with federal agencies 1306 about current immigration enforcement policies and priorities 1307 such written agreement and any reason for noncompliance with 1308 this section, if applicable. 1309 Section 35.âSection 908.14, Florida Statutes, is created to 1310 read: 1311 908.14âVisible Identification Standards for Immigration 1312 Based Law Enforcement Act.â 1313 (1)âThis act may be cited as the âVISIBLE Act.â 1314 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 1315 (a)ââCovered immigration officerâ means a person who is 1316 authorized to perform immigration enforcement functions and who 1317 is: 1318 1.âAn officer or employee of a law enforcement agency; 1319 2.âAn officer or employee of United States Customs and 1320 Border Protection; 1321 3.âAn officer or employee of United States Immigration and 1322 Customs Enforcement; or 1323 4.âA person authorized, deputized, or designated under 1324 federal law, regulation, or agreement to perform immigration 1325 enforcement functions. 1326 (b)ââPublic immigration enforcement functionâ means any 1327 activity that involves the direct exercise of federal 1328 immigration authority through public-facing actions, including a 1329 patrol, a stop, an arrest, a search, an interview to determine 1330 immigration status, a raid, a checkpoint inspection, or the 1331 service of a judicial or administrative warrant. The term does 1332 not include covert, nonpublic operations or nonenforcement 1333 activities. 1334 (c)ââVisible identificationâ means the display of the name 1335 or widely recognized initials of the employing agency of a 1336 covered immigration officer and the officerâs last name or badge 1337 or identification number in a size and format that complies with 1338 the requirements in subsection (4). 1339 (3)âA covered immigration officer who directly engages in a 1340 public immigration enforcement function within this state must 1341 wear visible identification at all times during such engagement. 1342 (4)âThe visible identification must meet all of the 1343 following requirements: 1344 (a)âFor the employing agency of the covered immigration 1345 officer, be displayed in a size and format that is clearly 1346 legible from a distance of not less than 25 feet, using 1347 materials or markings suitable for visibility in both daylight 1348 and low-light conditions under normal operational conditions. 1349 (b)âFor the covered immigration officerâs last name or 1350 badge or identification number, be displayed in a manner that is 1351 clearly visible and readable during direct engagement with the 1352 public. 1353 (c)âBe displayed on the covered immigration officerâs 1354 outermost garment or gear and may not be obscured by tactical 1355 equipment, body armor, or accessories. 1356 (5) A covered immigration officer may not wear nonmedical 1357 face coverings, including masks or balaclavas, which impair the 1358 visibility of the identifying information required under this 1359 section or obscure the officerâs face unless such face covering 1360 is necessary to protect the integrity of a covert, nonpublic 1361 operation or to guard against hazardous environmental 1362 conditions. 1363 (6)âThe State Board of Immigration Enforcement shall do all 1364 of the following: 1365 (a)âReceive and investigate complaints from the public 1366 concerning violations of this section. 1367 (b)âEnsure that a covered immigration officer who fails to 1368 comply with the requirements of this section receives 1369 appropriate disciplinary action, including a written reprimand, 1370 suspension, or other personnel action, consistent with the 1371 policies of the officerâs employing agency and any applicable 1372 collective bargaining agreement. 1373 (c)âMake recommendations to the Legislature concerning 1374 compliance with this section and corrective actions that should 1375 be taken. 1376 (d)âCarry out its responsibilities under this section in 1377 accordance with its statutory authority. 1378 (7)âBy June 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, the State 1379 Immigration Enforcement Council shall submit to the President of 1380 the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a 1381 report that includes all of the following information: 1382 (a)âThe total number of public immigration enforcement 1383 functions conducted during the reporting period. 1384 (b)âThe number of documented instances of noncompliance 1385 with this section. 1386 (c)âA summary of disciplinary or remedial actions taken 1387 against any covered immigration officer who did not comply with 1388 this section. 1389 Section 36.âSection 921.1426, Florida Statutes, is 1390 repealed. 1391 Section 37.âSection 943.1718, Florida Statutes, is amended 1392 to read: 1393 943.1718âBody cameras and face coverings; policies and 1394 procedures; penalties.â 1395 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1396 (a)ââBody cameraâ means a portable electronic recording 1397 device that is worn on a law enforcement officerâs person that 1398 records audio and video data of the officerâs law-enforcement 1399 related encounters and activities. 1400 (b)1.ââFace coveringâ means any opaque mask, garment, 1401 helmet, or other item, including, but not limited to, a 1402 balaclava, tactical mask, gator, ski mask, or any other similar 1403 type of facial covering or face-shielding item, which conceals 1404 or obscures the face of a person. 1405 2.âThe term does not include any of the following: 1406 a.âA translucent face shield or clear mask that does not 1407 conceal the wearerâs face. 1408 b.âA medical mask or surgical mask used to protect against 1409 the transmission of disease or infection. 1410 c.âAny other mask or device, including, but not limited to, 1411 air-purifying respirators, full or half masks, or self-contained 1412 breathing apparatuses necessary to protect against exposure to a 1413 toxin, gas, smoke, or any other hazardous environmental 1414 condition. 1415 (c)(b)ââLaw enforcement agencyâ means an agency that has a 1416 primary mission of preventing and detecting crime and enforcing 1417 the penal, criminal, traffic, and motor vehicle laws of the 1418 state and in furtherance of that primary mission employs law 1419 enforcement officers as defined in s. 943.10. 1420 (d)(c)ââLaw enforcement officerâ has the same meaning as 1421 provided in s. 943.10. 1422 (e)ââUndercover investigationâ means a planned act 1423 authorized by a law enforcement agency or a court order which 1424 uses an undercover operative to intentionally interact with a 1425 suspect or others or to obtain evidence of criminal activity. 1426 (f)ââUndercover operativeâ means a law enforcement officer 1427 or a full-time sworn officer in this state or another state or 1428 the Federal Government using an assumed name or cover identity 1429 to interact with persons or entities to collect evidence of 1430 criminal activity. 1431 (2)âBODY CAMERAS.â 1432 (a)âA law enforcement agency that permits its law 1433 enforcement officers to wear body cameras shall establish 1434 policies and procedures addressing the proper use, maintenance, 1435 and storage of body cameras and the data recorded by body 1436 cameras. The policies and procedures must include: 1437 1.(a)âGeneral guidelines for the proper use, maintenance, 1438 and storage of body cameras. 1439 2.(b)âAny limitations on which law enforcement officers are 1440 permitted to wear body cameras. 1441 3.(c)âAny limitations on law-enforcement-related encounters 1442 and activities in which law enforcement officers are permitted 1443 to wear body cameras. 1444 4.(d)âA provision permitting a law enforcement officer 1445 using a body camera to review the recorded footage from the body 1446 camera, upon his or her own initiative or request, before 1447 writing a report or providing a statement regarding any event 1448 arising within the scope of his or her official duties. Any such 1449 provision may not apply to an officerâs inherent duty to 1450 immediately disclose information necessary to secure an active 1451 crime scene or to identify suspects or witnesses. 1452 5.(e)âGeneral guidelines for the proper storage, retention, 1453 and release of audio and video data recorded by body cameras. 1454 (b)(3)âA law enforcement agency that permits its law 1455 enforcement officers to wear body cameras shall: 1456 1.(a)âEnsure that all personnel who wear, use, maintain, or 1457 store body cameras are trained in the law enforcement agencyâs 1458 policies and procedures concerning them. 1459 2.(b)âEnsure that all personnel who use, maintain, store, 1460 or release audio or video data recorded by body cameras are 1461 trained in the law enforcement agencyâs policies and procedures. 1462 3.(c)âRetain audio and video data recorded by body cameras 1463 in accordance with the requirements of s. 119.021, except as 1464 otherwise provided by law. 1465 4.(d)âPerform a periodic review of actual agency body 1466 camera practices to ensure conformity with the agencyâs policies 1467 and procedures. 1468 (c)(4)âChapter 934 does not apply to body camera recordings 1469 made by law enforcement agencies that elect to use body cameras. 1470 (3)âFACE COVERINGS.â 1471 (a)âA law enforcement officer may not wear a face covering 1472 in the performance of his or her official duties. 1473 (b)âBefore undertaking an undercover investigation that is 1474 reasonably likely to involve a law enforcement officer wearing a 1475 face covering in the performance of his or her official duties, 1476 a law enforcement agency must provide advance notice to the 1477 sheriff with jurisdiction over the location in which the 1478 undercover investigation takes place. Such notice must be given 1479 at least 12 hours before the undercover investigation begins and 1480 must include when and where the law enforcement officer will be 1481 operating, his or her planned actions, and the approximate time 1482 and duration of the undercover investigation. 1483 (c)âParagraph (a) does not apply to: 1484 1.âA law enforcement officer performing his or her duties 1485 as an undercover operative during an active undercover 1486 investigation; 1487 2.âProtective gear used by a Special Weapons and Tactics 1488 (SWAT) team officer which is necessary to protect his or her 1489 face from harm while performing SWAT team duties and 1490 responsibilities; or 1491 3.âExigent circumstances that involve an immediate danger 1492 or threat to persons or property or the escape of a perpetrator. 1493 (d)âA first violation of this subsection is an infraction. 1494 A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a 1495 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 1496 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1497 (e)âOn or before October 1, 2026, the Department of Law 1498 Enforcement shall adopt rules regulating the use of face 1499 coverings to comply with this subsection. 1500 Section 38.âPresent paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 1501 (3) of section 943.325, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 1502 paragraphs (c) and (d), respectively, and paragraph (a) of 1503 subsection (3) and paragraphs (b) and (f) of subsection (7) of 1504 that section are amended, to read: 1505 943.325âDNA database.â 1506 (3)âCOLLECTION OF SAMPLES.â 1507 (a)âEach qualifying offender must shall submit a DNA sample 1508 at the time he or she is booked into a jail, correctional 1509 facility, or juvenile facility. 1510 (b)âA person who becomes a qualifying offender solely 1511 because of the issuance of an immigration detainer by a federal 1512 immigration agency may must submit a DNA sample when the law 1513 enforcement agency having custody of the offender receives the 1514 detainer. A law enforcement agency may not forcibly extract a 1515 DNA sample from such person, and the person may not be charged 1516 with a criminal offense solely for refusing to submit a DNA 1517 sample. 1518 (7)âCOLLECTION OF DNA SAMPLES FROM OFFENDERS.â 1519 (b)âArrested qualifying offenders must submit a DNA sample 1520 at the time they are booked into a jail, correctional facility, 1521 or juvenile facility, except as provided in paragraph (3)(b). 1522 (f)âA law enforcement agency having custody of a person who 1523 becomes a qualifying offender solely because of the issuance of 1524 an immigration detainer by a federal immigration agency shall 1525 ensure that a DNA sample is taken from the offender immediately 1526 after the agency receives the detainer and shall secure and 1527 transmit the sample to the department in a timely manner. 1528 Section 39.âPresent subsection (9) of section 1000.05, 1529 Florida Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (10), and a new 1530 subsection (9) is added to that section, to read: 1531 1000.05âDiscrimination against students and employees in 1532 the Florida K-20 public education system prohibited; equality of 1533 access required.â 1534 (9)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 1535 1.ââCitizenship or immigration statusâ means any matter 1536 regarding citizenship of the United States or any other country 1537 or the authority or lack thereof to reside in or otherwise to be 1538 present in the United States, including a personâs nationality 1539 and country of citizenship. 1540 2.ââLaw enforcement agentâ means an agent of federal, 1541 state, or local law enforcement who has the power to arrest or 1542 detain a person or manage the custody of a detained person for a 1543 law enforcement purpose, including civil immigration 1544 enforcement. The term does not include a safe-school officer 1545 under s. 1006.12. 1546 3.ââNonjudicial warrantâ means a warrant issued by a 1547 federal, state, or local agency with the power to arrest or 1548 detain a person for any law enforcement purpose, including civil 1549 immigration enforcement. The term includes an immigration 1550 detainer as defined in s. 908.102. The term does not include a 1551 criminal warrant issued upon a judicial determination of 1552 probable cause in compliance with the requirements of the Fourth 1553 Amendment to the United States Constitution or s. 12, Art. I of 1554 the State Constitution. 1555 4.ââPrevailing partyâ means a party: 1556 a.âWho obtains some of his or her requested relief through 1557 a judicial judgment in his or her favor; 1558 b.âWho obtains some of his or her requested relief through 1559 a settlement agreement approved by the court; or 1560 c.âWhose pursuit of a nonfrivolous claim was a catalyst for 1561 a unilateral change in position by the opposing party relative 1562 to the relief sought. 1563 5.ââSchoolâ means a public school, school district, and 1564 governing body, including a charter school, and agents thereof, 1565 including a contracted party. 1566 (b)âA child in this state may not be denied a free public 1567 education through secondary school based on the perceived or 1568 actual immigration status of the child or perceived or actual 1569 citizenship or immigration status of the childâs parent or 1570 guardian. 1571 (c)âA school may not: 1572 1.âExclude a child from participation in or deny a child 1573 the benefits of a program or an activity on the grounds of the 1574 perceived or actual immigration status of the child or the 1575 perceived or actual citizenship or immigration status of the 1576 childâs parent or guardian. 1577 2.âUse policies or procedures or engage in practices that 1578 have the effect of excluding a child from participation in or 1579 denying the benefits of a program or an activity or the effect 1580 of excluding participation of the childâs parent or guardian 1581 from parental engagement activities or programs because of the 1582 perceived or actual immigration status of the child or the 1583 perceived or actual citizenship or immigration status of the 1584 childâs parent or guardian. These policies, procedures, and 1585 practices include both of the following: 1586 a.âRequesting or collecting information or documentation 1587 from a student or a studentâs parent or guardian about 1588 citizenship or immigration status unless required by state or 1589 federal law. 1590 b.âDesignating immigration status, citizenship, place of 1591 birth, nationality, or national origin as directory information 1592 as defined in 20 U.S.C. s. 1232g(a)(5). 1593 3.âThreaten to disclose anything relating to the actual or 1594 perceived citizenship or immigration status of a child or the 1595 childâs parent or guardian to any other person, entity, 1596 immigration agency, or law enforcement agency. 1597 4.âDisclose anything relating to the perceived citizenship 1598 or immigration status of a child or the childâs parent or 1599 guardian to any other person, entity, immigration agency, or law 1600 enforcement agency if the school does not have direct knowledge 1601 of the actual citizenship or immigration status of the child, 1602 parent, or guardian, subject to the requirements of this 1603 paragraph. 1604 5.âDisclose anything relating to the actual citizenship or 1605 immigration status of a child or the childâs parent or guardian 1606 to any other person or nongovernmental entity if the school has 1607 direct knowledge of the actual citizenship or immigration status 1608 of the child, parent, or guardian, subject to the requirements 1609 of this paragraph. 1610 1611 This paragraph does not authorize the disclosure of student 1612 records or information without complying with state and federal 1613 requirements governing the disclosure of such records or 1614 information. This paragraph does not prohibit or restrict an 1615 entity from sending to or receiving from the United States 1616 Department of Homeland Security or any other federal, state, or 1617 local governmental entity information regarding the citizenship 1618 or immigration status of a person under 8 U.S.C. ss. 1373 and 1619 1644. 1620 (d)âBy October 1, 2026, a school must develop procedures 1621 for reviewing and authorizing requests from a law enforcement 1622 agent attempting to enter a school or school facility. The 1623 procedures must comply with the requirements of this subsection 1624 and, at a minimum, include all of the following: 1625 1.âProcedures for reviewing and contacting a designated 1626 authorized person at the school, school facility, district 1627 superintendentâs office, or school administrative office who may 1628 contact the schoolâs legal counsel. 1629 2.âProcedures for the person authorized in subparagraph 1. 1630 or the schoolâs legal counsel to review all of the following: 1631 a.âRequests to enter a school or a school facility. 1632 b.âJudicial warrants. 1633 c.âNonjudicial warrants. 1634 d.âSubpoenas. 1635 3.âProcedures for monitoring, accompanying, and documenting 1636 all interactions with a law enforcement agent while on school 1637 premises. 1638 4.âProcedures for notifying and seeking consent from a 1639 studentâs parent or guardian, or from the student if the student 1640 is 18 years of age or older or emancipated, if a law enforcement 1641 agent requests access to a student for immigration enforcement 1642 purposes, unless a judicial warrant or subpoena restricts the 1643 disclosure of the information to the studentâs parent or 1644 guardian. 1645 (e)1.âBeginning October 1, 2026, a party aggrieved by 1646 conduct that violates this subsection may file a civil action in 1647 a court of competent jurisdiction. The aggrieved party must file 1648 such action within 2 years after the violation occurred. If the 1649 court finds that a willful violation of paragraph (c) has 1650 occurred, the court may award actual damages. The court may 1651 grant any permanent or preliminary negative or mandatory 1652 injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order. 1653 2.âUpon a motion, the court must award reasonable attorney 1654 fees and costs to a plaintiff who is a prevailing party in any 1655 action brought under this paragraph. 1656 3.âThis paragraph may not be construed to require a 1657 plaintiff to exhaust all administrative remedies before filing a 1658 civil action. 1659 (f)âBy October 1, 2026, a school must adopt policies for 1660 complying with this subsection. 1661 Section 40.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 1662 1002.31, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1663 1002.31âControlled open enrollment; public school parental 1664 choice.â 1665 (2) 1666 (c)âEach district school board must provide preferential 1667 treatment in its controlled open enrollment process to all of 1668 the following: 1669 1.âDependent children of active duty military personnel 1670 whose move resulted from military orders. 1671 2.âChildren who have been relocated due to a foster care 1672 placement in a different school zone. 1673 3.âChildren who move due to a court-ordered change in 1674 custody due to separation or divorce, or the serious illness or 1675 death of a custodial parent. 1676 4.âStudents residing in the school district. 1677 5.âChildren who are experiencing homelessness and children 1678 known to the department, as defined in s. 39.0016(1), regardless 1679 of their immigration status. 1680 Section 41.âParagraph (f) of subsection (1) of section 1681 1003.21, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1682 1003.21âSchool attendance.â 1683 (1) 1684 (f)âChildren and youths who are experiencing homelessness 1685 and children who are known to the department, as defined in s. 1686 39.0016(1), regardless of their immigration status s. 39.0016, 1687 must have access to a free public education and in accordance 1688 with s. 1002.31 must be admitted to the school of their parentâs 1689 or guardianâs choice, contingent on the schoolâs capacity, in 1690 the school district in which they or their families or guardians 1691 live. School districts shall assist such children in meeting the 1692 requirements of subsection (4) and s. 1003.22, as well as local 1693 requirements for documentation. 1694 Section 42.âParagraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (12) 1695 of section 1009.26, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1696 1009.26âFee waivers.â 1697 (12)(a)âA state university, a Florida College System 1698 institution, a career center operated by a school district under 1699 s. 1001.44, or a charter technical career center shall waive 1700 out-of-state fees for undergraduate and graduate students who 1701 are citizens of the United States or lawfully present in the 1702 United States who meet the following conditions: 1703 1.âAttended a secondary school in this state for 2 3 1704 consecutive years immediately before graduating from a high 1705 school in this state or received a high school equivalency 1706 diploma under s. 1003.435; 1707 2.âApply for enrollment in an institution of higher 1708 education within 24 months after high school or postsecondary 1709 graduation; and 1710 3.âSubmit an official Florida high school or postsecondary 1711 school transcript as evidence of attendance and graduation. In 1712 lieu of an official high school transcript, a student may submit 1713 a high school equivalency diploma under s. 1003.435. 1714 (b)âTuition and fees charged to a student who qualifies for 1715 the out-of-state fee waiver under this subsection may not exceed 1716 the tuition and fees charged to a resident student. The waiver 1717 is applicable for 110 percent of the required credit hours of 1718 the undergraduate or graduate degree or certificate program for 1719 which the student is enrolled. Each state university, Florida 1720 College System institution, career center operated by a school 1721 district under s. 1001.44, and charter technical career center 1722 shall report to the Board of Governors and the State Board of 1723 Education, respectively, the number and value of all fee waivers 1724 granted annually under this subsection. By October 1 of each 1725 year, the Board of Governors for the state universities and the 1726 State Board of Education for Florida College System 1727 institutions, career centers operated by a school district under 1728 s. 1001.44, and charter technical career centers shall annually 1729 report for the previous academic year the percentage of resident 1730 and nonresident students enrolled systemwide. 1731 (c)âA state university student granted an out-of-state fee 1732 waiver under this subsection must be considered a nonresident 1733 student for purposes of calculating the systemwide total 1734 enrollment of nonresident students as limited by regulation of 1735 the Board of Governors. In addition, A student who is granted an 1736 out-of-state fee waiver under this subsection is not eligible 1737 for state financial aid under part III of this chapter and may 1738 must not be reported as a resident for tuition purposes. 1739 Section 43.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 1740 1009.40, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1741 1009.40âGeneral requirements for student eligibility for 1742 state financial aid awards and tuition assistance grants.â 1743 (1)(a)âThe general requirements for eligibility of students 1744 for state financial aid awards and tuition assistance grants 1745 consist of the following: 1746 1.âAchievement of the academic requirements of and 1747 acceptance at a state university or Florida College System 1748 institution; a nursing diploma school approved by the Florida 1749 Board of Nursing; a Florida college or university which is 1750 accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the State 1751 Board of Education; a Florida institution the credits of which 1752 are acceptable for transfer to state universities; a career 1753 center; or a private career institution accredited by an 1754 accrediting agency recognized by the State Board of Education. 1755 2.âResidency in this state for no less than 1 year 1756 preceding the award of aid or a tuition assistance grant for a 1757 program established pursuant to s. 1009.50, s. 1009.505, s. 1758 1009.51, s. 1009.52, s. 1009.521, s. 1009.53, s. 1009.60, s. 1759 1009.62, s. 1009.72, s. 1009.73, s. 1009.75, s. 1009.77, s. 1760 1009.89, or s. 1009.894. Residency in this state must be for 1761 purposes other than to obtain an education. Resident status for 1762 purposes of receiving state financial aid awards shall be 1763 determined in the same manner as resident status for tuition 1764 purposes pursuant to s. 1009.21. However, a student may not be 1765 denied classification as a resident for purposes of receiving 1766 state financial aid based solely on the studentâs immigration 1767 status if he or she has met the conditions for an out-of-state 1768 fee waiver under s. 1009.26(12)(a). 1769 3.âSubmission of certification attesting to the accuracy, 1770 completeness, and correctness of information provided to 1771 demonstrate a studentâs eligibility to receive state financial 1772 aid awards or tuition assistance grants. Falsification of such 1773 information shall result in the denial of a pending application 1774 and revocation of an award or grant currently held to the extent 1775 that no further payments shall be made. Additionally, students 1776 who knowingly make false statements in order to receive state 1777 financial aid awards or tuition assistance grants commit a 1778 misdemeanor of the second degree subject to the provisions of s. 1779 837.06 and shall be required to return all state financial aid 1780 awards or tuition assistance grants wrongfully obtained. 1781 Section 44.âParagraph (w) of subsection (2) of section 1782 435.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1783 435.04âLevel 2 screening standards.â 1784 (2)âThe security background investigations under this 1785 section must ensure that persons subject to this section have 1786 not been arrested for and are awaiting final disposition of; 1787 have not been found guilty of, regardless of adjudication, or 1788 entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty to; or have not been 1789 adjudicated delinquent and the record has not been sealed or 1790 expunged for, any offense prohibited under any of the following 1791 provisions of state law or similar law of another jurisdiction: 1792 (w)âSection 787.07, relating to human smuggling. 1793 Section 45.âParagraph (e) of subsection (4) and paragraph 1794 (i) of subsection (5) of section 456.074, Florida Statutes, are 1795 amended to read: 1796 456.074âCertain health care practitioners; immediate 1797 suspension of license.â 1798 (4)âThe department shall issue an emergency order 1799 suspending the license of a massage therapist and establishment 1800 as those terms are defined in chapter 480 upon receipt of 1801 information that the massage therapist; the designated 1802 establishment manager as defined in chapter 480; an employee of 1803 the establishment; a person with an ownership interest in the 1804 establishment; or, for a corporation that has more than $250,000 1805 of business assets in this state, the owner, officer, or 1806 individual directly involved in the management of the 1807 establishment has been arrested for committing or attempting, 1808 soliciting, or conspiring to commit, or convicted or found 1809 guilty of, or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere 1810 to, regardless of adjudication, a violation of s. 796.07 or a 1811 felony offense under any of the following provisions of state 1812 law or a similar provision in another jurisdiction: 1813 (e)âSection 787.07, relating to human smuggling. 1814 (5)âThe department shall issue an emergency order 1815 suspending the license of any health care practitioner who is 1816 arrested for committing or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring 1817 to commit any act that would constitute a violation of any of 1818 the following criminal offenses in this state or similar 1819 offenses in another jurisdiction: 1820 (i)âSection 787.07, relating to human smuggling. 1821 Section 46.âParagraph (e) of subsection (6) of section 1822 480.041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1823 480.041âMassage therapists; qualifications; licensure; 1824 endorsement.â 1825 (6)âThe board shall deny an application for a new or 1826 renewal license if an applicant has been convicted or found 1827 guilty of, or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, 1828 regardless of adjudication, a violation of s. 796.07(2)(a) which 1829 is reclassified under s. 796.07(7) or a felony offense under any 1830 of the following provisions of state law or a similar provision 1831 in another jurisdiction: 1832 (e)âSection 787.07, relating to human smuggling. 1833 Section 47.âParagraph (e) of subsection (8) of section 1834 480.043, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1835 480.043âMassage establishments; requisites; licensure; 1836 inspection; human trafficking awareness training and policies.â 1837 (8)âThe department shall deny an application for a new or 1838 renewal license if an establishment owner or a designated 1839 establishment manager or, for a corporation that has more than 1840 $250,000 of business assets in this state, an establishment 1841 owner, a designated establishment manager, or any individual 1842 directly involved in the management of the establishment has 1843 been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere 1844 to any misdemeanor or felony crime, regardless of adjudication, 1845 related to prostitution or related acts as described in s. 1846 796.07 or a felony offense under any of the following provisions 1847 of state law or a similar provision in another jurisdiction: 1848 (e)âSection 787.07, relating to human smuggling. 1849 Section 48.âSubsection (5) of section 501.9741, Florida 1850 Statutes, is amended to read: 1851 501.9741âAssisting in veteransâ benefits matters.â 1852 (5)âBACKGROUND SCREENING.âA provider must ensure that all 1853 individuals who directly assist a veteran in a veteransâ 1854 benefits matter complete a level 2 background screening that 1855 screens for any offenses identified in s. 408.809(4) or s. 1856 435.04(2)(d), (e), or (nn) or (4) s. 435.04(2)(d), (e), or (oo) 1857 or (4) before entering into any agreement with a veteran for 1858 veteransâ benefits matters. An individual must submit a full set 1859 of fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement or to a 1860 vendor, entity, or agency authorized by s. 943.053(13), which 1861 shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Law 1862 Enforcement for state processing. The Department of Veteransâ 1863 Affairs shall transmit the background screening results to the 1864 provider, which results must indicate whether an individualâs 1865 background screening contains any of the offenses listed in this 1866 subsection. Fees for state and federal fingerprint processing 1867 must be borne by the provider or individual. The state cost for 1868 fingerprint processing is as provided in s. 943.053(3)(e). This 1869 subsection does not imply endorsement, certification, or 1870 regulation of providers by the Department of Veteransâ Affairs. 1871 Section 49.âSubsection (2) of section 775.30, Florida 1872 Statutes, is amended to read: 1873 775.30âTerrorism; defined; penalties.â 1874 (2)âA person who violates s. 782.04(1)(a)1. or (2), s. 1875 782.065, s. 782.07(1), s. 782.09, s. 784.045, s. 784.07, s. 1876 787.01, s. 787.02, s. 787.07, s. 790.115, s. 790.15, s. 790.16, 1877 s. 790.161, s. 790.1615, s. 790.162, s. 790.166, s. 790.19, s. 1878 806.01, s. 806.031, s. 806.111, s. 815.06, s. 815.061, s. 1879 859.01, or s. 876.34, in furtherance of intimidating or coercing 1880 the policy of a government, or in furtherance of affecting the 1881 conduct of a government by mass destruction, assassination, or 1882 kidnapping, commits the crime of terrorism, a felony of the 1883 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 1884 or s. 775.084. 1885 Section 50.âSubsection (1) of section 794.056, Florida 1886 Statutes, is amended to read: 1887 794.056âRape Crisis Program Trust Fund.â 1888 (1)âThe Rape Crisis Program Trust Fund is created within 1889 the Department of Health for the purpose of providing funds for 1890 rape crisis centers in this state. Trust fund moneys shall be 1891 used exclusively for the purpose of providing services for 1892 victims of sexual assault. Funds credited to the trust fund 1893 consist of those funds collected as an additional court 1894 assessment in each case in which a defendant pleads guilty or 1895 nolo contendere to, or is found guilty of, regardless of 1896 adjudication, an offense provided in s. 775.21(6) and (10)(a), 1897 (b), and (g); s. 784.011; s. 784.021; s. 784.03; s. 784.041; s. 1898 784.045; s. 784.048; s. 784.07; s. 784.08; s. 784.081; s. 1899 784.082; s. 784.083; s. 784.085; s. 787.01(3); s. 787.02(3); s. 1900 787.025; s. 787.06; s. 787.07; s. 794.011; s. 794.05; s. 794.08; 1901 former s. 796.03; former s. 796.035; s. 796.04; s. 796.05; s. 1902 796.06; s. 796.07(2)(a)-(d) and (i); s. 800.03; s. 800.04; s. 1903 810.14; s. 810.145; s. 812.135; s. 817.025; s. 825.102; s. 1904 825.1025; s. 827.071; s. 836.10; s. 847.0133; s. 847.0135(2); s. 1905 847.0137; s. 847.0145; s. 943.0435(4)(c), (7), (8), (9)(a), 1906 (13), and (14)(c); or s. 985.701(1). Funds credited to the trust 1907 fund also shall include revenues provided by law, moneys 1908 appropriated by the Legislature, and grants from public or 1909 private entities. 1910 Section 51.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) of section 1911 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1912 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 1913 chart.â 1914 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 1915 (d)âLEVEL 4 1916 1917 1918 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 1919 104.155 3rd Unqualified noncitizen electors voting; aiding or soliciting noncitizen electors in voting. 1920 499.0051(1) 3rd Failure to maintain or deliver transaction history, transaction information, or transaction statements. 1921 499.0051(5) 2nd Knowing sale or delivery, or possession with intent to sell, contraband prescription drugs. 1922 517.07(1) 3rd Failure to register securities. 1923 517.12(1) 3rd Failure of dealer or associated person of a dealer of securities to register. 1924 784.031 3rd Battery by strangulation. 1925 784.07(2)(b) 3rd Battery of law enforcement officer, firefighter, etc. 1926 784.074(1)(c) 3rd Battery of sexually violent predators facility staff. 1927 784.075 3rd Battery on detention or commitment facility staff. 1928 784.078 3rd Battery of facility employee by throwing, tossing, or expelling certain fluids or materials. 1929 784.08(2)(c) 3rd Battery on a person 65 years of age or older. 1930 784.081(3) 3rd Battery on specified official or employee. 1931 784.082(3) 3rd Battery by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 1932 784.083(3) 3rd Battery on code inspector. 1933 784.085 3rd Battery of child by throwing, tossing, projecting, or expelling certain fluids or materials. 1934 787.03(1) 3rd Interference with custody; wrongly takes minor from appointed guardian. 1935 787.04(2) 3rd Take, entice, or remove child beyond state limits with criminal intent pending custody proceedings. 1936 787.04(3) 3rd Carrying child beyond state lines with criminal intent to avoid producing child at custody hearing or delivering to designated person. 1937 787.07 3rd Human smuggling. 1938 790.115(1) 3rd Exhibiting firearm or weapon within 1,000 feet of a school. 1939 790.115(2)(b) 3rd Possessing electric weapon or device, destructive device, or other weapon on school property. 1940 790.115(2)(c) 3rd Possessing firearm on school property. 1941 794.051(1) 3rd Indecent, lewd, or lascivious touching of certain minors. 1942 800.04(7)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition; offender less than 18 years. 1943 806.135 2nd Destroying or demolishing a memorial or historic property. 1944 810.02(4)(a) 3rd Burglary, or attempted burglary, of an unoccupied structure; unarmed; no assault or battery. 1945 810.02(4)(b) 3rd Burglary, or attempted burglary, of an unoccupied conveyance; unarmed; no assault or battery. 1946 810.06 3rd Burglary; possession of tools. 1947 810.08(2)(c) 3rd Trespass on property, armed with firearm or dangerous weapon. 1948 810.145(3)(b) 3rd Digital voyeurism dissemination. 1949 812.014(2)(c)3. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree $10,000 or more but less than $20,000. 1950 812.014â(2)(c)4. &â6.-10. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree; specified items. 1951 812.014(2)(d)2. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree; $750 or more taken from dwelling or its unenclosed curtilage. 1952 812.014(2)(e)3. 3rd Petit theft, 1st degree; less than $40 taken from dwelling or its unenclosed curtilage with two or more prior theft convictions. 1953 812.0195(2) 3rd Dealing in stolen property by use of the Internet; property stolen $300 or more. 1954 817.505(4)(a) 3rd Patient brokering. 1955 817.563(1) 3rd Sell or deliver substance other than controlled substance agreed upon, excluding s. 893.03(5) drugs. 1956 817.568(2)(a) 3rd Fraudulent use of personal identification information. 1957 817.5695(3)(c) 3rd Exploitation of person 65 years of age or older, value less than $10,000. 1958 817.625(2)(a) 3rd Fraudulent use of scanning device, skimming device, or reencoder. 1959 817.625(2)(c) 3rd Possess, sell, or deliver skimming device. 1960 828.125(1) 2nd Kill, maim, or cause great bodily harm or permanent breeding disability to any registered horse or cattle. 1961 836.14(2) 3rd Person who commits theft of a sexually explicit image with intent to promote it. 1962 836.14(3) 3rd Person who willfully possesses a sexually explicit image with certain knowledge, intent, and purpose. 1963 837.02(1) 3rd Perjury in official proceedings. 1964 837.021(1) 3rd Make contradictory statements in official proceedings. 1965 838.022 3rd Official misconduct. 1966 839.13(2)(a) 3rd Falsifying records of an individual in the care and custody of a state agency. 1967 839.13(2)(c) 3rd Falsifying records of the Department of Children and Families. 1968 843.021 3rd Possession of a concealed handcuff key by a person in custody. 1969 843.025 3rd Deprive law enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation officer of means of protection or communication. 1970 843.15(1)(a) 3rd Failure to appear while on bail for felony (bond estreature or bond jumping). 1971 843.19(2) 2nd Injure, disable, or kill police, fire, or SAR canine or police horse. 1972 847.0135(5)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition using computer; offender less than 18 years. 1973 870.01(3) 2nd Aggravated rioting. 1974 870.01(5) 2nd Aggravated inciting a riot. 1975 874.05(1)(a) 3rd Encouraging or recruiting another to join a criminal gang. 1976 893.13(2)(a)1. 2nd Purchase of cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (b), or (d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs). 1977 914.14(2) 3rd Witnesses accepting bribes. 1978 914.22(1) 3rd Force, threaten, etc., witness, victim, or informant. 1979 914.23(2) 3rd Retaliation against a witness, victim, or informant, no bodily injury. 1980 916.1085â(2)(c)1. 3rd Introduction of specified contraband into certain DCF facilities. 1981 934.215 3rd Use of two-way communications device to facilitate commission of a crime. 1982 944.47(1)(a)6. 3rd Introduction of contraband (cellular telephone or other portable communication device) into correctional institution. 1983 951.22(1)(h),â(j) & (k) 3rd Intoxicating drug, instrumentality or other device to aid escape, or cellular telephone or other portable communication device introduced into county detention facility. 1984 Section 52.âSection 938.085, Florida Statutes, is amended 1985 to read: 1986 938.085âAdditional cost to fund rape crisis centers.âIn 1987 addition to any sanction imposed when a person pleads guilty or 1988 nolo contendere to, or is found guilty of, regardless of 1989 adjudication, a violation of s. 775.21(6) and (10)(a), (b), and 1990 (g); s. 784.011; s. 784.021; s. 784.03; s. 784.041; s. 784.045; 1991 s. 784.048; s. 784.07; s. 784.08; s. 784.081; s. 784.082; s. 1992 784.083; s. 784.085; s. 787.01(3); s. 787.02(3); 787.025; s. 1993 787.06; s. 787.07; s. 794.011; s. 794.05; s. 794.08; former s. 1994 796.03; former s. 796.035; s. 796.04; s. 796.05; s. 796.06; s. 1995 796.07(2)(a)-(d) and (i); s. 800.03; s. 800.04; s. 810.14; s. 1996 810.145; s. 812.135; s. 817.025; s. 825.102; s. 825.1025; s. 1997 827.071; s. 836.10; s. 847.0133; s. 847.0135(2); s. 847.0137; s. 1998 847.0145; s. 943.0435(4)(c), (7), (8), (9)(a), (13), and 1999 (14)(c); or s. 985.701(1), the court shall impose a surcharge of 2000 $151. Payment of the surcharge shall be a condition of 2001 probation, community control, or any other court-ordered 2002 supervision. The sum of $150 of the surcharge shall be deposited 2003 into the Rape Crisis Program Trust Fund established within the 2004 Department of Health by chapter 2003-140, Laws of Florida. The 2005 clerk of the court shall retain $1 of each surcharge that the 2006 clerk of the court collects as a service charge of the clerkâs 2007 office. 2008 Section 53.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.